Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 29 Americanization Schools

16-29-1.
Establishment of free evening schools.

One or more public evening schools, in which attendance shall be free for persons resident in the city or town in which the school shall be located, and in which the speaking, reading, and writing of the English language shall be taught for two (2) hours on each of at least one hundred (100) nights between the first of September and the first of June in each year, shall be established and maintained by the school committee of every city or town in which twenty (20) or more persons more than sixteen (16) and less than twenty-one (21) years of age, who cannot speak, read, and write the English language, are resident; provided, that the school committee of two (2) adjoining cities or towns may unite for the purpose of establishing and maintaining jointly, at some convenient place, an evening school for persons resident in these cities or towns.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-1

.

16-29-2.
Day continuation schools.

The school committee of any city or town may establish and maintain one or more public day continuation schools for the teaching of the English language and American citizenship, at which any person beyond compulsory school age, resident in the city or town, may attend free of expense, or may make provisions, at the expense of the city or town, for the attendance of these persons in continuation schools in other cities or towns.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-2

.

16-29-3.
Schools in shops and factories.

For the purpose of this chapter day continuation or evening schools may be established in shops or factories; provided, that these schools are under control and supervision of the school committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-3

.

16-29-4.
Notice to department of schools established.

The superintendent of schools of every city or town shall annually, on or before the first day of October, notify the department of elementary and secondary education in writing of the number and location and hours of session of schools established and maintained by the school committee in compliance with the provision of §

16-29-1

, and after this shall give immediate and similar notice of any school or schools subsequently established during the school year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 8; P.L. 1920, ch. 1903, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-4

.

16-29-5.
State support of public schools.

Public evening schools and day continuation schools established under the provisions of this chapter may, if approved by the department of elementary and secondary education, receive state support from the annual appropriations for evening schools and industrial education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-5

.

16-29-6.
Visitation and supervision by department of elementary and secondary education.

The department of elementary and secondary education is authorized and empowered to provide for the visitation, inspection, and supervision of day and evening schools maintained under the provisions of this chapter, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary to defray the expenses of the visitation, inspection, and supervision, for meeting any appropriation as may be provided by the federal government for similar purposes, and for the promotion of Americanization; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of this sum as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 6; P.L. 1925, ch. 580, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-6

.

16-29-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-7

; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 8, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 126, § 1, effective July 8, 2019.

16-29-8.
Private instruction in lieu of required attendance.

Attendance in private schools or private instruction in the English language may be accepted as compliance with this chapter in lieu of attendance on public instruction only if the private instruction is approved by the school committee as substantially equivalent in content, method, and the hours of instruction to the instruction offered in public schools. Persons instructed in private schools, or receiving private instruction in accordance with the provisions of this section, shall be deemed as having acquired reasonable facility in speaking, reading, and writing the English language as provided in §

16-29-7

only after the successful passage by the person of an examination provided for by the school committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-8

.

16-29-9.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-9

; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 8, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 126, § 1, effective July 8, 2019.

16-29-10.
Enforcement of attendance requirement.

The truant officer or truant officers appointed by the school committee in compliance with the provisions of §

16-19-3

shall, under the direction of the school committee, inquire into all cases of irregular attendance or of failure or neglect to attend upon instruction in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, and shall be authorized to make complaints in case of violation of the compulsory attendance provisions of this chapter, and to serve legal processes issued in pursuance of this chapter; provided, that no truant officer complaining under the provisions of this chapter shall be required to give surety for costs, and no officer shall become liable for any costs that may accrue on the complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1802, § 7; P.L. 1920, ch. 1903, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-10

.

16-29-11.
Establishment of home and community classes.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary for the promotion of home and community classes in any city or town for instruction in the use of the English language, in the common rights and obligations of citizenship, and in the fundamental principles of the American plan of government. These classes may be established and maintained by the department of elementary and secondary education or by the school committee of any city or town, and may be held in the day or evening and, except as provided in this section, shall be open to any person over sixteen (16) years of age who cannot read, write, or speak the English language, and may be held in homes or in other suitable places approved by the school committee of the city or town or by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 9; P.L. 1930, ch. 1532, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-11

.

16-29-12.
Teachers for home classes — Joint maintenance by two or more towns.

When in any city or town a class of twenty (20) or more persons has been organized in accordance with the provisions of §

16-29-11

, the school committee shall provide a teacher for this class, and pay the expenses of instruction from the appropriation of the city or town for the support of the public schools. The school committee of two (2) or more adjoining cities or towns may unite for the purpose of establishing and maintaining classes jointly at convenient places as provided in §

16-29-11

, and may determine by agreement what part of the cost of maintenance shall be paid by each city or town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 9; P.L. 1930, ch. 1532, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-12

.

16-29-13.
Attendance at home classes.

Attendance upon any class shall not be obligatory, but where there is a day or evening school maintained by a city or town in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, no resident of the city or town under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be allowed to attend any class except by permission of the superintendent of schools of the city or town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 9; P.L. 1930, ch. 1532, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-13

.

16-29-14.
State home class supervisor — Expenditures.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall appoint a home class supervisor whose duty it shall be to recruit, organize, supervise, and teach classes authorized by §§

16-29-11

through

16-29-13

, and to cooperate with the school committee of any city or town in the establishment and maintenance of the classes; and the department may fix the compensation of the supervisor within the appropriation made by §

16-29-11

to be paid from the appropriation. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment from time to time of the sum appropriated or so much of this sum as may be necessary, upon receipt of vouchers approved by the state department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 80, § 9; P.L. 1930, ch. 1532, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 196, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-29-14

.